Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.500

Taxation—Street poll tax.

A town may impose upon and collect from every inhabitant of the town over eighteen years of age an annual street poll tax not exceeding two dollars and no other road poll tax shall be collected within the limits of the town.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 52; 1971 ex.s. c 292 s 62; 1965 c 7 s 35.27.500. Prior: 1905 c 75 s 1, part; RRS s 9210, part.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 292: See note following RCW 26.28.010.